North Dakota, session 69, SB2187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 44-08-04 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. For travel within the state, the following rates for each quarter of any twenty-four-hour
period must be used:
a. First quarter is from six a.m. to twelve noon and the sum must be nine dollars.
First quarter reimbursement may not be made if travel began after seven a.m.
b. Second quarter is from twelve noon to six p.m. and the sum must be fourteen
dollars.
c. Third quarter is from six p.m. to twelve midnight and the sum must be twenty-two
dollars.
d. Fourth quarter is from twelve midnight to six a.m. and the sum must be the actual
lodging expenses not to exceed an amount established by policy by the director
of the office of management and budget plus any additional applicable state or
local taxes. The director shall establish a policy to set the lodging reimbursement
at an amount equal to ninety percent ofrate as the rate established by the United
States general services administration for lodging reimbursement in this state. A
political subdivision may reimburse an elective or appointive officer, employee,
representative, or agent for actual lodging expenses.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 54-03-20 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.0265.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. a. Each member of the legislative assembly is entitled to receive reimbursement for
lodging, which may not exceed per calendar month the amount established under
this subdivision by the director of the office of management and budget for
lodging in state and which may not exceed the rate provided in section 44-08-04
for each calendar day during the period of any organizational, special, or regular
session. On August first of each even-numbered year, the director of the office of
management and budget shall set the maximum monthly reimbursement for the
subsequent two-year period at an amount equal to thirty times seventy eighty - five
percent of the daily lodging reimbursement in effect on that date as provided
under subdivision d of subsection 2 of section 44-08-04.
b. Notwithstanding subdivision a:
(1) A member of the legislative assembly may elect to be reimbursed for less
than the amount to which the legislator is entitled under this subsection by
claiming the lesser amount on a voucher submitted with the receipt required
by section 44-08-04.
(2) The legislative management may establish guidelines that may result in a
reduced maximum reimbursement for a single dwelling in which two or more
legislators share lodging and the total rent for that dwelling exceeds the
amount to which a legislator is entitled under subdivision a.
Page No. 2 25.0265.01000